Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-515
Department; duties; powers.

(1) Before the construction manager begins any construction services, the department shall:

(a) Conduct an independent cost estimate for the project; and

(b) Conduct contract negotiations with the construction manager to develop a construction manager-general contractor contract for construction services.

(2) If the construction manager and the department are unable to negotiate a contract, the department may use other contract procurement processes. Persons or organizations who submitted proposals but were unable to negotiate a contract with the department shall be eligible to compete in the other contract procurement processes.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 15.